Arkansas, session 2025, SB48.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-79-168 is amended to read as follows:
23-79-168. Deductible based on percentage of insured value —
Disclosure required.
A An owner-occupied residential property insurance policy issued or
renewed in this state that bases the deductible under the insurance policy
for any loss, other than a loss due to an earthquake, on a percentage of the
insured value of the insured property shall disclose to the insured the
monetary amount of the deductible, other than for a loss due to an
earthquake, on the policy declaration page or notice of renewal of the
policy.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
*ANS103*
01-28-2025 10:26:25 ANS103

As Engrossed: S1/28/25 SB48
23-79-169. Deductibles — Disclosure required.
(a) An insurance policy for owner-occupied residential property
insurance issued or renewed in this state shall disclose, as applicable, on
the policy declaration page or notice of renewal of the policy all
deductibles included under the policy in a clear and conspicuous manner so
that the insured can identify any applicable deductibles under the policy or
renewal.
(b) An insurance policy for owner-occupied residential property
insurance issued or renewed in this state that contains separate deductible
levels by peril shall display these deductible amounts together with the
policy's all other peril deductible, if applicable, on the policy declaration
page or notice of renewal of the policy.

/s/J. Boyd






















01-28-2025 10:26:25 ANS103